Washington statutes.
RCW 43.30.020

Definitions.

The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(1) "Administrator" means the administrator of the department of natural resources.

(2) "Agency" and "state agency" means any branch, department, or unit of the state government, however designated or constituted.

(3) "Board" means the board of natural resources.

(4) "Commissioner" means the commissioner of public lands.

(5) "Department" means the department of natural resources.

(6) "Supervisor" means the supervisor of natural resources.

[ 2010 c 126 s 7; 2009 c 163 s 6; 1965 c 8 s 43.30.020. Prior: 1957 c 38 s 2.]

NOTES:

Findings—Intent—2009 c 163: See note following RCW 43.30.835.